Illinois, session 104th, HB4891.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Veterans Affairs Act is 5amended by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2805/4)  (from Ch. 126 1/2, par. 69)7    Sec. 4. A service officer shall be assigned to each field 8office. All service officers and any supervisors, including 9the field manager, within the field division must be currently 10serving reservists or national guardsmen in good standing or 11an honorably discharged veterans veteran from service in the 12Armed Forces of the United States, active or reserve 13components. They must have served during a time of hostilities 14with a foreign country, and must meet one or more of the 15following conditions:16        (i) The veteran served a total of at least 6 months.17        (ii) The veteran served for the duration of 18    hostilities regardless of the length of engagement.19        (iii) The veteran was discharged on the basis of 20    hardship.21        (iv) The veteran was released from active duty because 22    of a service-connected disability and was discharged under 23    honorable conditions.  HB4891 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20088 KTG 33539 b1    As used in this Section, "time of hostilities with a 2foreign country" means any period of time in the past, 3present, or future during which a declaration of war by the 4United States Congress has been or is in effect or during which 5an emergency condition has been or is in effect that is 6recognized by the issuance of a Presidential proclamation or a 7Presidential executive order and in which the armed forces 8expeditionary medal or other campaign service medals are 9awarded according to Presidential executive order.10(Source: P.A. 102-467, eff. 1-1-22.)